New York, session 2025-2026, A11659.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 377-a 2 to read as follows: 3 § 377-a. Pre-approved residential construction plan library. 1. The 4 department, in consultation with the council, shall develop and maintain 5 a library of pre-approved residential construction plans which are in 6 compliance with the uniform code promulgated pursuant to section three 7 hundred seventy-seven of this article and certified by climate region. 8 Such plans shall be reviewed and updated to ensure compliance with the 9 uniform code as determined by the department. 10 2. The governing body of a municipal corporation may adopt a local 11 law, ordinance or resolution providing that such municipality accepts 12 pre-approved residential construction plans from the library established 13 pursuant to subdivision one of this section for the purposes of the 14 building code of such municipality, provided, however, such local law, 15 ordinance or resolution shall not be deemed to impact a municipality's 16 control over zoning, setbacks, historic preservation, or site-specific 17 engineering. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD16124-01-6